Massachusetts, session 194th, S2065.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting, after section 6N, the following section:-
Section 6O. Every individual who files a separate return and every husband and wife
filing a return jointly may voluntarily contribute all or part of any refund to which they are
entitled or may voluntarily add an amount onto any amount due, to be credited to the
Massachusetts Firefighters Academy Trust established pursuant to section 165A of chapter 6.
A contribution made under this section may be with respect to any taxable year at the
time of filing a return of the tax established by this chapter for such taxable year; provided,
however, that the commissioner shall prescribe the manner in which such contribution shall be
of 2

made on the face of the return required by section 5 of chapter 62C, provided further that the
commissioner shall assure that taxpayers filing any such forms are made clearly aware of their
ability to make the contributions provided for by this section.
The commissioner shall annually report the total amount designated under this section to
the state treasurer, who shall credit such amount to said Massachusetts Firefighters Academy
Trust.
of 2